Tennessee, session 114, HB1369.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 6, Part 50, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) The department of health shall make available and require blood lead level
testing for all children prior to attendance at public schools that service any combination
of pre-kindergarten through grade twelve (pre-K-12) students.
(b) A child tested pursuant to this section who has elevated blood lead levels
must be immediately screened to determine if educational services pursuant to the
Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. § 1400 et seq.) may be required.
(c) A child tested pursuant to this section who has lead poisoning must receive
mandated wraparound services appropriate for lead poisoned children.
(d) This section does not apply to a child whose parent or guardian opts out of
such testing or referrals required by this section.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 37, Chapter 1, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
If a juvenile detention facility that receives federal funding is aware that a juvenile
in custody of such detention facility has elevated blood lead levels or lead poisoning,
then the detention facility shall, in collaboration with the department of health and local
education agencies, provide wraparound services appropriate for children with elevated
blood lead levels or lead poisoning for such juvenile.
HB1369
002625
- 1 -

SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 68, Chapter 1, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
The department shall make available and require blood lead level testing for a
pregnant woman who receives vouchers for the special supplemental food program for
women, infants, and children administered by the department. If a woman is tested
pursuant to this section and it is determined that she has elevated blood lead levels or
lead poisoning, then the department shall provide the woman specialized nutritional
services, education on how to mitigate lead in the body, and other mandated
wraparound services tailored for people with elevated blood lead levels or lead
poisoning.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 002625